Utah statutes.
76-10-1607.   Evidentiary value of criminal judgment in civil proceeding.

A final judgment or decree rendered in favor of the state or a county in any criminal proceeding brought by this state or a county shall preclude the defendant from denying the essential allegations of the criminal offense in any subsequent civil proceeding.

